Washington statutes.
RCW 15.36.401

Licenses—Denial, suspension, revocation—Reasons.

(1) A license issued under this chapter may be denied, suspended, or revoked by the director when a person:

(a) Fails to comply with the provisions of this chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter;

(b) Refuses the department access to a portion or area of a facility regulated under this chapter, for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter;

(c) Fails to comply with an order of the director;

(d) Refuses to make available to the department records required to be kept under the provisions of this chapter;

(e) Fails to comply with the applicable provisions of chapter 15.130 RCW, *Washington intrastate commerce in food, drugs, and cosmetics act, or rules adopted under that chapter;

(f) Interferes with the director in the performance of his or her duties; or

(g) Exhibits negligence, misconduct, or lack of qualification in the discharge of his or her functions.

Upon notice by the director to deny, revoke, or suspend a license, a person may request a hearing under chapter 34.05 RCW.

(2) Whenever a milk transport vehicle is found in violation of this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter, the endorsement for that milk transport vehicle contained on a milk hauler's license may be suspended or revoked. The suspension or revocation does not apply to any other milk transport vehicle operated by the milk hauler.

(3) A license may be revoked by the director upon serious or repeated violations or after a license suspension or degrade for thirty continuous days without correction of the items causing the suspension or degrade.

[ 2018 c 236 s 703; 1999 c 291 s 15; 1994 c 143 s 501.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The chapter name for chapter 15.130 RCW is "food safety and security act."